Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.185

Deposit of moneys—Weights and measures account—General fund.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all moneys collected under this chapter shall be payable to the director and placed in the weights and measures account hereby established in the agricultural local fund. Moneys deposited in this account shall be used solely for the purposes of implementing or enforcing this chapter. No appropriation is required for the disbursement of moneys from the weights and measures account by the director.

(2) Civil penalties collected by the department under RCW 19.94.510, 19.94.515, and 19.94.517 shall be deposited in the state general fund.

[ 1998 c 245 s 9; 1995 c 355 s 8; 1992 c 237 s 8.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.